Mississippi, session 2026, HB423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Sections 41-20-1, 41-20-3, 41-20-5, 41-20-7, 41-20-9 and 41-20-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, which create within the Department of Finance and Administration a position known as the Coordinator of Mental Health Accessibility, provide for the appointment, qualifications, expenses and salary for the position, establish powers, duties and discretionary responsibilities of the position, require inter-agency cooperation with the coordinator of Mental Health Accessibility in performing his or her duties, and set forth definitions and related provisions, are repealed. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.